Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-806
Official ballots; color; type style and size; envelope for ballot; restrictions.

(1) All official ballots prepared pursuant to the Election Act shall be white in color, except that the election commissioner, county clerk, or city or village clerk may designate a distinctive color of ballot or ink for city, village, or school elections or, when authorized by the Secretary of State, for elections of any other political subdivision. If a distinctive color is designated, the color of the ballot shall not be the same as the sample ballots as provided in section 32-804. The style and size of type on official ballots shall be as close as possible to the style used on the ballots furnished by the Secretary of State.

(2) No envelope for a ballot for a general or special election shall display any indication of the voter's political party affiliation on its exterior.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 227;

Laws 2026, LB1075, § 15.
July 18, 2026